Utah statutes.
31A-30-211.   Insurer disclosure.

(1)  The Health Insurance Exchange shall provide an employer's producer with the group's risk factor used to calculate the employer group's premium at the time of:

(a)  the initial offering of a health benefit plan; and

(b)  the renewal of a health benefit plan.

(2)  For health benefit plans that renew on or after March 1, 2012:

(a)  a carrier shall provide an employer and the employer's producer with premium renewal rates at least 60 days prior to the group's renewal date for a plan offered under Part 1, Individual and Small Employer Group; and

(b)  the Health Insurance Exchange shall provide an employer and the employer's producer with premium renewal rates at least 60 days prior to the group's renewal date for a plan offered under Part 2, Defined Contribution Arrangements.

(3)  An insurer does not have to provide additional notice of premium renewal rates to the employer or the employer's producer if the Health Insurance Exchange provides notice in accordance with Subsection (2)(b).



Amended by Chapter 5, 2011 Special Session 2

